Utah statutes.
63A-5-602.   Appropriation for energy efficiency measures.

(1)  For purposes of this part:

(a)  "Energy efficiency measures" is as defined in Section 63A-5-701.

(b)  "Energy savings" means money not expended by a state agency as the result of energy efficiency measures.

(c)  "State agency" is as defined in Section 63A-5-701.

(2)  Except as provided under Subsection (4) and subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature may not remove energy savings from a state agency's appropriation.

(3)  A state agency shall use energy savings to:

(a)  fund the cost of the energy efficiency measures; and

(b)  if funds are available after meeting the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), fund and implement new energy efficiency measures.

(4)  The Legislature may remove energy savings if:

(a)  a state agency has complied with Subsection (3)(a); and

(b)  no cost effective new energy efficiency measure is available for implementation.

(5)  A state agency may consult with the State Building Energy Efficiency Program manager in the Division of Facilities and Construction Management regarding:

(a)  the cost effectiveness of energy efficiency measures; and

(b)  ways to measure energy savings that take into account fluctuations in energy costs and temperature.



Enacted by Chapter 334, 2008 General Session

